Alabama, session 2026rs, SB249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
10 Section 1. Sections 32-6-271 and 32-6-280, Code of
11 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
12 "§32-6-271
13 (a) A firefighter, upon application and subject to this
14 division, may be issued a distinctive motor vehicle license
15 plate as identification as a firefighter. In addition to the
16 proper numbers, words, and insignias used on the standard
17 license plate issued for motor vehicles, the distinctive
18 plates issued to firefighters shall bear a red Maltese cross
19 emblem on each side to the left and right of the regular tag
20 numbers. The words "Fire Fighter" should be centered at the
21 bottom of the license plate.
22 (b) In addition to any other fees provided for by law,
23 an annual additional fee of one dollar ($1.00) ten dollars
24 ($10) is added to the cost of the firefighter distinctive
25 license plate provided for in this division, effective January
26 1, 2022. The annual additional fee collected pursuant to this
27 section shall be distributed by each licensing official to the
28 state Comptroller, less the commission provided in Section
Page 1

state Comptroller, less the commission provided in Section
SB249 Enrolled
29 40-12-269. The state Comptroller shall distribute the net
30 proceeds monthly as follows:
31 (1) Fifty cents ($.50)Twenty-five percent shall be
32 deposited into a fund managed by the Alabama Joint Fire
33 Council and shall be used for the purpose of expanding and
34 maintaining the Alabama Firefighter Memorial located in
35 Tuscaloosa.
36 (2) Fifty cents ($.50)Twenty-five percent shall be
37 distributed to the Alabama Joint Fire Council to be used for
38 expenses associated with the Firefighter Peer Support Program.
39 (3) Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the
40 board of the Alabama Firefighters Annuity and Benefit Fund.
41 (4) Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the
42 secretary-treasurer of the Alabama Firefighters Emergency
43 Relief Fund.
44 (c) The funds generated by this the fee in subsection
45 (b) shall be subject to audit from either the Department of
46 Examiners of Public Accounts or an independent certified
47 public accountant once every three calendar years effective
48 January 1, 2022."
49 "§32-6-280
50 (a) As used in this section division, the following
51 terms shall have the following meanings:
52 (1) Professional firefighterPROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTER.
53 means aA paid member of a paid or part-paid fire department of
54 a city, town, county, or other subdivision of the state,
55 including the chief, assistant chief, warden, engineer,
56 captain, firemen firefighters, and all other officers and
Page 2

captain, firemen firefighters, and all other officers and
SB249 Enrolled
57 employees of the department who actually engage in fire
58 fighting firefighting or rendering first aid at the scene of
59 an accident.
60 (2) Retired professional firefighterRETIRED
61 PROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTER. means aA retired member of a paid or
62 part-paid fire department of a city, town, county, or other
63 subdivision of the state, including the chief, assistant
64 chief, warden, engineer, captain, firemen firefighters, and
65 all other officers and employees of the department who
66 actually engaged in fire fighting firefighting or rendering
67 first aid at the scene of an accident. Notwithstanding any
68 other provision of this division, retired professional
69 firefighter the term includes a retired professional
70 firefighter who is a resident of this state and who has
71 retired from a professional fire department in another state
72 and otherwise meets the requirements of this section division.
73 (b)(1) Notwithstanding Sections 32-6-64, 32-6-67, and
74 32-6-68, a professional firefighter or a retired professional
75 firefighter, upon application and subject to the provisions of
76 this section division, may be issued a distinctive motor
77 vehicle license plate as identification as a professional
78 firefighter or a retired professional firefighter, and a
79 professional firefighter, upon application and subject to this
80 section, may be issued a distinctive motor vehicle license
81 plate as identification as a professional firefighter.
82 (2) In addition to the proper numbers, words, and
83 insignias used on the standard license plate issued for motor
84 vehicles, the distinctive plates so license plate issued for a
Page 3

vehicles, the distinctive plates so license plate issued for a
SB249 Enrolled
85 retired professional firefighter shall have a design created
86 by the state association of professional firefighters in
87 coordination with the Mobile Retired Firefighters and
88 Paramedics Association and the Tuscaloosa Retired Firefighters
89 Association, and the distinctive license plate so issued for a
90 professional firefighter shall have a design created by the
91 state association of professional firefighters.
92 (c)(1) The distinctive license plates provided herein
93 shall be approved by the Commissioner of Revenue and shall be
94 issued through the judge of probate, license commissioner, or
95 other license issuing official of the several counties of the
96 state in the same manner as are other motor vehicle license
97 plates, and the officers shall be entitled to their regular
98 fees for the service.
99 (2) By December 1 of each year, the Firefighters'
100 Personnel Standards and Education Commission shall submit to
101 the judge of probate, the license commissioner, or other
102 license issuing official of each county a list of eligible
103 professional firefighters and retired professional
104 firefighters retired from paid or part-paid fire departments
105 under this section. The Firefighters' Personnel Standards and
106 Education Commission shall also add to the list any retired
107 professional firefighter retired from a paid or part-paid fire
108 department in from another state who submits proof to the
109 commission of eligibility pursuant to this division. The
110 Firefighters' Personnel Standards and Education Commission
111 shall also submit to the judge of probate, the license
112 commissioner, or other license issuing official of each county
Page 4

commissioner, or other license issuing official of each county
SB249 Enrolled
113 a list of eligible professional firefighters from paid or
114 part-paid fire departments.
115 (3) Any person individual who joins a paid or part-paid
116 fire department after December 1 of any year or any person
117 individual who is omitted from the list prepared as described
118 in subdivision (2) may obtain a distinctive license plate by
119 presenting to the license issuing official proof of his or her
120 membership in a paid or part-paid fire department by means of
121 a certificate signed by the chief of the department on a form
122 prescribed by the Firefighters' Personnel Standards and
123 Education Commission.
124 (4) Upon the initial application for a retired
125 professional firefighter distinctive license plate under this
126 section, an applicant for a distinctive license plate provided
127 in this section shall present to the judge of probate, the
128 license commissioner, or other license issuing official of the
129 county, proof of his or her retirement from a fire department
130 that is included on the list provided by the Firefighters'
131 Personnel Standards and Education Commission. Proof of the
132 person's individual's retirement from a fire department
133 included on the that list from the Firefighters' Personnel
134 Standards and Education Commission is not required for renewal
135 of the distinctive license plate.
136 (5) Upon the applicant submitting proof of his or her
137 identification, the professional firefighter or retired
138 professional firefighter shall be issued the requested number
139 of distinctive license plates upon the payment of the regular
140 fee for license plates, as provided by law, but shall not be
Page 5

fee for license plates, as provided by law, but shall not be
SB249 Enrolled
141 required to pay the three dollar ($3) fee.
142 (6) Upon the applicant submitting proof of his or her
143 identification, the retired professional firefighter shall be
144 issued the requested number of distinctive license plates upon
145 the payment of the regular license fee for plates, as provided
146 by law, but shall not be required to pay the three dollar ($3)
147 fee.
148 (7)(6) The distinctive license plates so issued shall
149 be used only upon and for personally owned, private passenger
150 vehicles, to include station wagons and pick-up trucks,
151 registered in the name of the retired professional firefighter
152 or professional firefighter making application therefor, and,
153 when so issued to the applicant, shall be used upon the
154 vehicle for which issued in lieu of the standard license
155 plates normally issued for the vehicle.
156 (8)a.(7)a. In addition to any other fees provided for
157 by law, an annual additional fee of one dollar ($1.00) is
158 added to the cost of the retired professional firefighter and
159 the professional firefighter distinctive license platesplate
160 provided for in this division, effective January 1, 2022. The
161 annual additional fee collected pursuant to this section
162 paragraph shall be distributed by each licensing official to
163 the state Comptroller, less the commission provided in Section
164 40-12-269. The Comptroller shall distribute the total net
165 proceeds monthly into a fund managed by the Alabama Joint Fire
166 Council to be used for the purpose of expanding and
167 maintaining the Alabama Firefighter Memorial located in
168 Tuscaloosa.
Page 6

Tuscaloosa.
SB249 Enrolled
169 b. An annual additional fee of ten dollars ($10) is
170 added to the cost of the professional firefighter distinctive
171 license plates provided for in this division. The combined
172 fees shall be distributed by each licensing official to The
173 the state Comptroller, less the commission provided in Section
174 40-12-269. The Comptroller shall distribute the net proceeds
175 monthly as follows:
176 1. Fifty cents ($.50)Twenty-five percent shall be
177 deposited into a fund managed by the Alabama Joint Fire
178 Council and shall be used for the purpose of expanding and
179 maintaining the Alabama Firefighter Memorial located in
180 Tuscaloosa.
181 2. Fifty cents ($.50)Twenty-five percent shall be
182 distributed to the Alabama Joint Fire Council to be used for
183 expenses associated with the Firefighter Peer Support Program.
184 3. Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the
185 board of the Alabama Firefighters Annuity and Benefit Fund.
186 4. Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the
187 secretary-treasurer of the State of Alabama Firefighters
188 Emergency Relief Fund.
189 b.c. The funds generated by this the feefees shall be
190 subject to audit from either the Department of Examiners of
191 Public Accounts or an independent certified public accountant
192 once every three calendar years effective January 1, 2022.
193 (9)(8) Anyone who is proven to have either falsely
194 obtained or certified an individual to obtain a distinctive
195 professional firefighter or retired professional firefighter
196 license plate or a distinctive professional firefighter
Page 7

license plate or a distinctive professional firefighter
SB249 Enrolled
197 license plate shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor, and
198 upon conviction, shall be punished according to law.
199 (d) Retired professional firefighters firefighter
200 distinctive license plates and professional firefighter
201 distinctive license plates as provided by this section shall
202 be prepared and furnished for the licensing year commencing
203 January 1, 2012, and thereafter as is provided by law for the
204 issuance of other license plates. Professional firefighters
205 distinctive license plates as provided by this section shall
206 be prepared and furnished for the licensing year commencing
207 January 1, 2016, and thereafter as is provided by law for the
208 issuance of other license plates.
209 (e) The Department of Revenue may adopt any rules
210 necessary to administer this section division."
211 Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
212 1, 2027.
Page 8

1, 2027.
SB249 Enrolled
213
214
215
216
217
218
219 ________________________________________________
220 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
221
222
223
224 ________________________________________________
225 Speaker of the House of Representatives
226
227
228 SB249
229 Senate 19-Feb-26
230 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
231 the Senate.
232
233 Patrick Harris,
234 Secretary.
235
236
237
238
239 House of Representatives
240 Passed: 05-Mar-26
241
242
243
244
245 By: Senator Barfoot
Page 9